Utah statutes.
53-3-909.   Program exemption.
An entity offering a motorcycle rider training course approved by the division
and an instructor providing instruction as part of an approved motorcycle
rider training course are exempt from the requirements of Title 53, Chapter 3,
Part 5, Commercial Driver Training Schools Act.
